sk-SK: Forma samolepiacej podložky: Vrátane obojstranných lepiacich podložiek; Vrátane lepiacich bodiek; Bez podkladu (len štítok); Vopred nanesená lepiaca podložka; Vrátane samostatných lepiacich nálepiek; Iné
hr-HR: Format samoljepljive podloge: Uključeni jastučići od dvostrane trake; Uključene točkice ljepila; Bez ljepljive poleđine (samo jezičak); Unaprijed naneseni ljepljivi jastučić; Uključene zasebne ljepljive naljepnice; Ostalo
fr: Format à dos autocollant: Tampons adhésifs double face inclus; Pastilles de colle incluses; Sans support (languette uniquement); Tampon adhésif pré-appliqué; Autocollants séparés inclus; Autre
it: Formato del supporto autoadesivo: Cuscinetti biadesivi inclusi; Punti di colla inclusi; Nessun supporto incluso (solo linguetta); Cuscinetto adesivo preapplicato; Adesivi separati inclusi; Altro
pl: Format podkładu samoprzylepnego: W zestawie dwustronna taśma; W zestawie kropki kleju; Brak w zestawie (tylko wypustka); Wstępnie nałożona podkładka samoprzylepna; W zestawie oddzielne naklejki samoprzylepne; Inne
da: Format for selvklæbende bagside: Dobbeltklæbende puder medfølger; Limprikker medfølger; Ingen bagside medfølger (kun fane); Forud påført klæbepude; Separate klæbemærker medfølger; Andet
bg-BG: Формат на самозалепващата основа: Включени двустранни лепилни подложки; Включени лепилни точки; Не е включена основа (само лентичка); Предварително поставена лепилна подложка; Включени отделни лепилни стикери; Друго
ko: 자가접착식 뒷면 형태: 양면 테이프 패드 포함; 글루 도트 포함; 뒷면 받침 미포함(탭만 제공); 접착 패드 사전 부착; 개별 접착 스티커 포함; 기타
ja: 自己粘着性バックフォーマット: 両面テープパッド付属; グルードット付属; 粘着面なし (タブのみ); 粘着パッド付き; 専用粘着ステッカー付属; その他
en: Self-adhesive backing format: Double-sided tape pads included; Glue dots included; No backing included (tab only); Pre-applied adhesive pad; Separate adhesive stickers included; Other
hu: Öntapadó hátlap formátuma: Kétoldalas ragasztópárnák mellékelve; Ragasztópöttyök mellékelve; Hátlap nélkül (csak fül); Előre felvitt ragasztópárna; Különálló ragasztómatricák mellékelve; Egyéb
nb: Format for selvklebende bakside: Dobbeltsidige tapeputer inkludert; Limputer inkludert; Ingen bakside inkludert (kun fane); Forhåndspåført limpute; Separate klistremerker inkludert; Annet
th: รูปแบบแผ่นกาวในตัว: มีแผ่นเทปกาวสองหน้า; มีกาวจุด; ไม่มีแผ่นรอง (เฉพาะแถบ); ติดแผ่นกาวมาให้; มีสติกเกอร์กาวแยกต่างหาก; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Format samolepilne hrbtne strani: Vključene obojestranske lepilne blazinice; Vključene lepilne pike; Brez podlage (samo zavihek); Predhodno nanešena lepilna blazinica; Vključene ločene lepilne nalepke; Drugo
zh-TW: 自黏式背膠格式: 內附雙面膠墊; 內附膠點; 無背襯 (僅標籤); 預塗自黏膠墊; 內附獨立自黏貼紙; 其他
nl: Vorm van zelfklevende achterkant: Inclusief dubbelzijdige tapepads; Inclusief lijmpuntjes; Geen kleeflaag inbegrepen (alleen label); Vooraf aangebrachte kleefpad; Inclusief losse zelfklevende stickers; Overig
cs: Formát samolepicího podkladu: Včetně oboustranných lepicích polštářků; Včetně lepicích bodů; Bez lepicí vrstvy (pouze úchyt); Předem nanesený lepicí polštářek; Včetně samostatných lepicích štítků; Jiné
fi: Itsekiinnittyvän pinnan formaatti: Mukana kaksipuoliset teippipalat; Mukana liimatäplät; Ei taustaa (vain tarrakiinnike); Valmiiksi kiinnitetty liimatyyny; Mukana erilliset tarrat; Muu
vi: Định dạng của lớp keo tự dính ở mặt sau: Kèm miếng dán băng keo hai mặt; Kèm điểm keo; Không kèm lớp mặt sau (chỉ có thẻ dán); Miếng dán keo bôi sẵn; Kèm miếng dán keo rời; Khác
pt-PT: Formato com suporte autoadesivo: Almofadas de fita de dupla face incluídas; Pontos de cola incluídos; Sem suporte incluído (apenas aba); Almofada adesiva pré-aplicada; Autocolantes adesivos separados incluídos; Outro
ro-RO: Format al suportului autoadeziv: Paduri cu bandă dublu adezivă incluse; Puncte de adeziv incluse; Fără suport inclus (doar filă); Pad adeziv pre-aplicat; Stickere adezive separate incluse; Altele
lt-LT: Lipnaus pagrindo formatas: Pridėtos dvipusės lipnios juostos pagalvėlės; Pridėti klijų taškeliai; Be pagrindo (tik ąselė); Iš anksto uždėta lipni pagalvėlė; Pridėti atskiri lipdukai; Kita
de: Art der selbstklebenden Rückseite: Doppelseitige Klebepads enthalten; Klebepunkte enthalten; Ohne Kleberückseite (nur Streifen); Vorab angebrachtes Klebepad; Separate Klebesticker enthalten; Andere
es: Formato de respaldo autoadhesivo: Incluye almohadillas de cinta de doble cara; Incluye puntos de pegamento; No incluye reverso (solo lengüeta); Almohadilla adhesiva preaplicada; Incluye pegatinas adhesivas por separado; Otro
tr: Kendinden yapışkanlı arka yüzey formatı: Çift taraflı bant pedleri dahil; Yapıştırıcı noktalar dahil; Arka kaplama dahil değil (yalnızca askı); Önceden uygulanmış yapışkan ped; Ayrı yapışkanlı çıkartmalar dahil; Diğer
sv: Självhäftande baksida – utförande: Dubbelhäftande tejpkuddar ingår; Klisterprickar ingår; Ingen baksida ingår (endast flik); Förapplicerad klisterkudde; Separata klistermärken ingår; Övrigt
ru: Формат самоклеящейся основы: Двусторонние клейкие подушечки в комплекте; Клеевые точки в комплекте; Без подложки (только ярлычок); С предварительно нанесенным клеевым слоем; Отдельные клейкие стикеры в комплекте; Другое
zh-CN: 自粘背胶形式: 附带双面胶垫; 附带胶点; 不含背胶（仅限突耳）; 预贴胶垫; 附带独立胶贴; 其他
el: Μορφή αυτοκόλλητης πίσω όψης: Περιλαμβάνονται κομμάτια ταινίας διπλής όψης; Περιλαμβάνονται σταγόνες κόλλας; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται υπόστρωμα (μόνο προεξοχή); Προεφαρμοσμένο αυτοκόλλητο υπόστρωμα; Περιλαμβάνονται ξεχωριστά αυτοκόλλητα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Suporte autoadesivo, formato: Almofadas de fita dupla face incluídas; Pontos de cola incluídos; Sem verso adesivo (apenas aba); Almofada adesiva pré-aplicada; Adesivos separados incluídos; Outros